District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.42

Legislative immunity.

For any speech or debate made in the course of their legislative duties, the members of the Council shall not be questioned in any other place.

June 8, 1976, D.C. Law 1-65, § 3, 22 DCR 7151
1981 Ed., § 1-223.
1973 Ed., § 1-141b.